Illinois, session 104th, HB1681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Agency Student Worker Opportunity Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 55/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the State 8Agency Student Worker Opportunity Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-141, eff. 1-1-18.)